Florida, session 2026, SB832.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âPresent subsection (2) of section 627.0621, 29 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3) and amended, 30 and a new subsection (2) is added to that section, to read: 31 627.0621âTransparency in rate regulation.â 32 (2)âRATE TRANSPARENCY REPORT.â 33 (a)âBeginning October 1, 2026, every rate filing requesting 34 a rate change for residential property coverage from a property 35 insurer must include a rate transparency report for acceptance 36 or, if necessary, modification by the insurer as directed by the 37 office. The office may accept the rate transparency report for 38 filing; or, if the office finds that the report fails to provide 39 the required information in concise, plain language that aids 40 consumers in their understanding of insurance or that the report 41 is misleading, the office must return the report to the insurer 42 with specific directions for modification. The officeâs 43 acceptance of the report for use or direction for modification 44 may not be deemed an approval pursuant to s. 627.062. The report 45 must be compiled in a uniform format prescribed by the 46 commission and must include a graphical representation 47 identifying a percentage breakdown of rating factors anticipated 48 by the company, book, or program affected by the filing. 49 (b)âAlong with an offer of coverage and upon renewal, an 50 insurer shall provide the corresponding copy of the rate 51 transparency report for the consumersâ offered rate to aid 52 consumers in their understanding of insurance. If the report has 53 not been accepted for use or modified in accordance with the 54 officeâs direction, the report must indicate that it is 55 preliminary and subject to modification by the insurer at the 56 direction of the office. 57 (c)âThe rate transparency report must include the following 58 categories of the book or program at the cumulative level: 59 1.âThe percentage of the total rate factor associated with 60 the cost of reinsurance. 61 2.âThe percentage of the total rate factor associated with 62 the cost of claims. 63 3.âThe percentage of the total rate factor associated with 64 the defense containment and costs. 65 4.âThe percentage of the total rate factor associated with 66 fees and commissions. 67 5.âThe percentage of the rate factor associated with profit 68 and contingency of the insurer. 69 6.âAny other categories deemed necessary by the office or 70 commission. 71 72 An estimated percentage of the influence of each listed factor 73 provided must equal 100 percent. 74 (d)âThe insurer shall provide the rate transparency report 75 to the office upon the filing of a rate change with the office. 76 (e)âIn addition to the categories required in paragraph 77 (c), the rate transparency report must also include the 78 following information: 79 1.âAll major adverse findings by the office for the 80 previous 3 calendar years. 81 2.âWhether the insurer uses affiliated entities to perform 82 functions of the insurer. 83 3.âContact information, including a telephone number, hours 84 of service, and an e-mail address, for the Division of Consumer 85 Services of the department. 86 4.âContact information for the office. 87 5.âAddress for the website for public access to rate filing 88 and affiliate information outlined in subsection (3). 89 6.âAny change in the total insured value from the last 90 policy period. 91 (f)âThe office shall define, in concise and plain language, 92 any term used in the rate transparency report to aid consumers 93 in their understanding of insurance. 94 (3)(2)âWEBSITE FOR PUBLIC ACCESS TO RATE FILING 95 INFORMATION.â 96 (a)âThe office shall establish and maintain a comprehensive 97 resource center on its website which uses concise and plain 98 language to aid consumers in their understanding of insurance. 99 The website must include substantive information on the current 100 and historical dynamics of the market, data concerning the 101 financial condition and market conduct of insurance companies, 102 and insurance options available to consumers. At a minimum, the 103 website must contain the following: 104 1.âReports, using graphical information whenever possible, 105 which outline information about the state of the market and 106 adverse and positive trends affecting it. 107 2.âTools that aid consumers in finding insurers, including, 108 but not limited to, a listing of all companies actively doing 109 business in this state which includes each companyâs address, 110 website, and all phone numbers and e-mail addresses to be used 111 by insureds and applicants for coverage. 112 3.âTools that aid consumers in selecting the coverages 113 beneficial to them, including, but not limited to: 114 a.âEducational materials that explain the types of coverage 115 in residential property insurance policies; the difference 116 between replacement cost reimbursement and actual cash value 117 reimbursement; a glossary of common terms used in policies; and 118 a comparison of the coverage, terms, conditions, and exclusions 119 contained in different homeownersâ and dwelling fire forms. 120 b.âAnswers to commonly asked questions about residential 121 property insurance coverage. 122 4.âInformation about mitigation credits and the My Safe 123 Florida Home Program, as well as other credits and discounts 124 insurers may offer beyond wind mitigation. 125 5.âAccess to the rate transparency report, annual 126 statements, market conduct information, and other information 127 related to each insurer. 128 6.âInformation on the Citizens Property Insurance 129 Corporation takeout process, the clearinghouse, and general 130 information as reported by the office. 131 7.âInformation on the claims process, including, but not 132 limited to: 133 a.âClear, step-by-step guidance on how to file a claim, 134 what to expect during the claim process, and timelines for 135 resolution of a claim. 136 b.âThe obligations of insurers and insureds related to 137 claim reporting, claim handling, communications regarding 138 claims, claim investigations, claim decisions, and claim 139 payments. 140 c.âFor each insurer with active policies in this state, the 141 means by which to report a claim, including any phone numbers, 142 e-mail addresses, or website addresses used for claim reporting. 143 8.âInformation on consumer protection, including, but not 144 limited to: 145 a.âThe rights of insureds under Florida law related to 146 coverage; coverage renewals, nonrenewals, and cancellations; and 147 mandated offers of coverage. 148 b.âInformation on how to file consumer complaints with the 149 Division of Consumer Services in the Department of Financial 150 Services. 151 9.âInformation on news and updates relevant to consumers 152 regarding this stateâs residential property insurance market, 153 including regulatory changes, information on insurers that enter 154 or exit the market, and industry trends. 155 10.âInformation on disaster preparedness directly related 156 to insurance, prepared by the office or by the Division of 157 Emergency Management. 158 11.âWith respect to any residential property rate filing, 159 the office shall provide the following information on a publicly 160 accessible Internet website: 161 a.1.âThe overall rate change requested by the insurer. 162 b.2.âThe rate change approved by the office along with all 163 of the actuaryâs assumptions and recommendations forming the 164 basis of the officeâs decision. 165 c.3.âCertification by the officeâs actuary that, based on 166 the actuaryâs knowledge, his or her recommendations are 167 consistent with accepted actuarial principles. 168 d.âWhether the insurer uses affiliated entities to perform 169 administrative, claims handling, or other functions of the 170 insurer and, if so, the total percentage of direct written 171 premium paid to the affiliated entities by the insurer in the 172 preceding calendar year. 173 (b)âFor any rate filing, regardless of whether or not the 174 filing is subject to a public hearing, the office shall provide 175 on its website a means for any policyholder who may be affected 176 by a proposed rate change to send an e-mail regarding the 177 proposed rate change. Such e-mail must be accessible to the 178 actuary assigned to review the rate filing. 179 (c)âThe statewide average requested rate change and final 180 approved statewide average rate change within a filing is not a 181 trade secret as defined in s. 688.002 or s. 812.081(1) and is 182 not subject to the public records exemption for trade secrets 183 provided in s. 119.0715 or s. 624.4213. 184 (d)âCounty rating examples submitted to the office through 185 the rate collection system for the purpose of displaying rates 186 on the office website are not a trade secret as defined in s. 187 688.002 or s. 812.081(1) and are not subject to the public 188 records exemption for trade secrets provided in s. 119.0715 or 189 s. 624.4213. 190 Section 2.âPresent subsections (5) and (6) of section 191 627.7011, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 192 and (7), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to that 193 section, to read: 194 627.7011âHomeownersâ policies; offer of replacement cost 195 coverage and law and ordinance coverage.â 196 (5)âWhen establishing the coverage amount or adjusting a 197 claim for a dwelling or other structure under a homeownerâs 198 insurance policy, an insurer may not include the value of the 199 land on which such dwelling or structure is located. This 200 subsection may not be construed to permit inclusion of the value 201 of land for dwellings or structures located on the shoreline, 202 surrounded in whole or in part by a body of water, or on land 203 formed or altered by erosion or accretion. 204 Section 3.âSection 627.7142, Florida Statutes, is amended 205 to read: 206 627.7142âHomeowner Claims Bill of Rights.âAn insurer 207 issuing a personal lines residential property insurance policy 208 in this state must provide a Homeowner Claims Bill of Rights to 209 a policyholder within 14 days after receiving an initial 210 communication with respect to a claim. The purpose of the bill 211 of rights is to summarize, in simple, nontechnical terms, 212 existing Florida law regarding the rights of a personal lines 213 residential property insurance policyholder who files a claim of 214 loss. The Homeowner Claims Bill of Rights is specific to the 215 claims process and does not represent all of a policyholderâs 216 rights under Florida law regarding the insurance policy. The 217 Homeowner Claims Bill of Rights does not create a civil cause of 218 action by any individual policyholder or class of policyholders 219 against an insurer or insurers. The failure of an insurer to 220 properly deliver the Homeowner Claims Bill of Rights is subject 221 to administrative enforcement by the office but is not 222 admissible as evidence in a civil action against an insurer. The 223 Homeowner Claims Bill of Rights does not enlarge, modify, or 224 contravene statutory requirements, including, but not limited 225 to, ss. 626.854, 626.9541, 627.70131, 627.7015, and 627.7074, 226 and does not prohibit an insurer from exercising its right to 227 repair damaged property in compliance with the terms of an 228 applicable policy or ss. 627.7011(7)(e) and 627.702(7) ss. 229 627.7011(6)(e) and 627.702(7). The Homeowner Claims Bill of 230 Rights must state: 231 232 HOMEOWNER CLAIMS 233 BILL OF RIGHTS 234 This Bill of Rights is specific to the claims process 235 and does not represent all of your rights under 236 Florida law regarding your policy. There are also 237 exceptions to the stated timelines when conditions are 238 beyond your insurance companyâs control. This document 239 does not create a civil cause of action by an 240 individual policyholder, or a class of policyholders, 241 against an insurer or insurers and does not prohibit 242 an insurer from exercising its right to repair damaged 243 property in compliance with the terms of an applicable 244 policy. 245 246 YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO: 247 1.âReceive from your insurance company an 248 acknowledgment of your reported claim within 7 days 249 after the time you communicated the claim. 250 2.âUpon written request, receive from your 251 insurance company within 30 days after you have 252 submitted a complete proof-of-loss statement to your 253 insurance company, confirmation that your claim is 254 covered in full, partially covered, or denied, or 255 receive a written statement that your claim is being 256 investigated. 257 3.âReceive from your insurance company a copy of 258 any detailed estimate of the amount of the loss within 259 7 days after the estimate is generated by the 260 insurance companyâs adjuster. 261 4.âWithin 60 days, subject to any dual interest 262 noted in the policy, receive full settlement payment 263 for your claim or payment of the undisputed portion of 264 your claim, or your insurance companyâs denial of your 265 claim. 266 5.âReceive payment of interest, as provided in s. 267 627.70131, Florida Statutes, from your insurance 268 company, which begins accruing from the date your 269 claim is filed if your insurance company does not pay 270 full settlement of your initial, reopened, or 271 supplemental claim or the undisputed portion of your 272 claim or does not deny your claim within 60 days after 273 your claim is filed. The interest, if applicable, must 274 be paid when your claim or the undisputed portion of 275 your claim is paid. 276 6.âFree mediation of your disputed claim by the 277 Florida Department of Financial Services, Division of 278 Consumer Services, under most circumstances and 279 subject to certain restrictions. 280 7.âNeutral evaluation of your disputed claim, if 281 your claim is for damage caused by a sinkhole and is 282 covered by your policy. 283 8.âContact the Florida Department of Financial 284 Services, Division of Consumer Servicesâ toll-free 285 helpline for assistance with any insurance claim or 286 questions pertaining to the handling of your claim. 287 You can reach the Helpline by phone at ...(toll-free 288 phone number)..., or you can seek assistance online at 289 the Florida Department of Financial Services, Division 290 of Consumer Servicesâ website at ...(website 291 address).... 292 293 YOU ARE ADVISED TO: 294 1.âFile all claims directly with your insurance 295 company. 296 2.âContact your insurance company before entering 297 into any contract for repairs to confirm any managed 298 repair policy provisions or optional preferred 299 vendors. 300 3.âMake and document emergency repairs that are 301 necessary to prevent further damage. Keep the damaged 302 property, if feasible, keep all receipts, and take 303 photographs or video of damage before and after any 304 repairs to provide to your insurer. 305 4.âCarefully read any contract that requires you 306 to pay out-of-pocket expenses or a fee that is based 307 on a percentage of the insurance proceeds that you 308 will receive for repairing or replacing your property. 309 5.âConfirm that the contractor you choose is 310 licensed to do business in Florida. You can verify a 311 contractorâs license and check to see if there are any 312 complaints against him or her by calling the Florida 313 Department of Business and Professional Regulation. 314 You should also ask the contractor for references from 315 previous work. 316 6.âRequire all contractors to provide proof of 317 insurance before beginning repairs. 318 7.âTake precautions if the damage requires you to 319 leave your home, including securing your property; and 320 turning off your gas, water, and electricity;, and 321 contacting your insurance company; and providing 322 provide a phone number where you can be reached. 323 324 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.